Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
CHAPTER 9 Court Proceedings

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that: “all appointments of guardians of the person or property made pursuant to former Title 29 shall continue in effect and shall thereafter be governed by the provisions of this Act.”

29-9-1.
Application of chapter.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, the provisions of this chapter shall apply to any proceeding in the court that arises under this title. Compliance with the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed to be sufficient for proceedings in the court arising under this title, except as otherwise provided in Chapter 11 of Title 9, Chapter 9 of Title 15, and Chapter 11 of this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 24/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted “Title 9, Chapter 9 of Title 15, and Chapter 11 of this title” for “Title 9 and Chapter 9 of Title 15” at the end of the second sentence of this Code section.

29-9-2.
Appointment of guardian ad litem; representation of persons not sui juris; limited appointment; identification of parties in all petitions; authority of conservator or guardian to act; ineligibility of appointed counsel to be appointed guardian ad litem.

The court, in its discretion, may at any time appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the interests of a minor, a proposed ward, or a ward in proceedings relating to the guardianship or conservatorship of that individual. However, the appointment of a guardian ad litem does not supersede any specific requirement for that individual to be served either by personal service or in the manner provided by subsection (a) of Code Section 15-9-17, and the guardian ad litem may not waive personal service for that individual.

Except as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection, when a person who is entitled to notice under any provision of this title is not sui juris, the interests of such person shall be represented in the proceeding by a guardian ad litem; provided, however, that the court may determine for the purpose of the particular proceeding that the natural guardian, if any, or the testamentary guardian, if any, or the duly constituted conservator, if any, or the duly constituted guardian, if any, has no conflict of interest and thus may represent for the purpose of the proceeding a person who is not sui juris. Service upon or notice to a guardian ad litem shall constitute service upon or notice to such person who is not sui juris, and except as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 15-9-17, no additional service upon or notice to such person shall be required. Waivers, acknowledgments, consents, answers, objections, or other documents executed by a guardian ad litem shall, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 15-9-17, be binding upon the person represented. The guardian ad litem may represent a single person or more than one person or a class of persons with common or nonadverse interests.

Whenever a guardian ad litem is appointed, the court may limit the appointment, may remove the guardian ad litem, or may at any time for cause appoint a successor guardian ad litem.

In every petition filed in the court, the petitioner shall identify each person who requires a guardian ad litem and the name and address of any person who is acting as conservator or guardian of the party. A copy of the letters appointing the conservator or guardian shall be attached to the petition or the petition shall allege such facts as shall show the authority of such conservator or guardian to act.

The authority of a conservator or guardian to act may be established under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph by showing:

Compliance by a foreign guardian of a minor with the filing requirements of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-2-74 or of Code Section 29-2-76;

Compliance by a foreign conservator of the property of a minor with the filing requirements of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-3-115 or of Code Section 29-3-117;

Compliance by a foreign guardian of an adult with the filing requirements of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-95 or of Code Section 29-4-97;

Compliance by a foreign conservator of the property of an adult with the filing requirements of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-5-135 or of Code Section 29-5-137; or

The registration and recording of a guardianship order or conservatorship order from another state under Article 4 of Chapter 11 of this title.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph, the court may take judicial notice of the issuance of the letters appointing such conservator or guardian, and of the authority of such conservator or guardian to act, in the manner provided by Chapter 2 of Title 24.

A person who is appointed as counsel for a ward, proposed ward, or alleged incapacitated person is not eligible to be appointed as guardian ad litem for the same individual, and a person who is appointed as guardian ad litem for a ward, proposed ward, or alleged incapacitated person is not eligible to be appointed as counsel for the same individual.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 25/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, designated the existing provisions of subsection (a) as paragraph (a)(1); in paragraph (a)(1), substituted “court, in its discretion,” for “court in its discretion” near the beginning of the first sentence and substituted “requirement for that individual to be served either by personal service or in the manner provided by subsection (a) of Code Section 15-9-17, and” for “requirement that individual be served by personal service and” in the second sentence; redesignated former subsection (b) as present paragraph (a)(2); in paragraph (a)(2), substituted “paragraph (1) of this subsection” for “subsection (a) of this Code section” near the beginning of the first sentence, substituted “such” for “that” three times, substituted “sui juris, and except as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 15-9-17, no” for “sui juris and no” in the second sentence, and inserted “, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 15-9-17,” following “ad litem shall” in the third sentence; redesignated subsections (c) and (d) as paragraph (a)(3) and subparagraph (a)(4)(A), respectively; in subparagraph (a)(4)(A), substituted “guardian to act.” for “guardian to act; provided, however, that” at the end of the second sentence; added subparagraphs (a)(4)(B) and (a)(4)(C); and added subsection (b).

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2017).

29-9-3.
Assessment of costs, compensation, fees, and expenses; factors; enforcement; abuse, neglect, or exploitation.

Except as otherwise ordered by the court under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 29-4-10, under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 29-5-10, or under subsection (b) of Code Section 29-11-16, and except as otherwise provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 9-12-135, all costs of court under Code Sections 15-9-60 and 15-9-126 or other applicable law and all compensation, fees, and expenses awarded by the court under subsections (a) and (b) of Code Section 29-9-15, under Code Section 29-9-16, or under subsection (b) of Code Section 29-9-18, may be assessed and shall be paid as directed by the court in the exercise of its sound discretion and as the court may deem to be in the best interest of the minor, proposed ward, or ward who is the subject of the particular proceeding as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section.

In any proceeding for the appointment of a guardian or conservator pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, or 11 of this title, the costs, compensation, fees, and expenses provided for by subsection (a) of this Code section may be assessed and shall be paid as directed by the court in the exercise of its sound discretion and as the court may deem to be in the best interest of the minor, proposed ward, or ward who is the subject of the proceeding, considering the following:

The estate of the minor or ward for whom a guardian or conservator is appointed in such proceeding;

The conduct of the petitioners in any such proceeding in which no guardianship order or conservatorship order is entered by the court;

Whether such costs, compensation, fees, and expenses shall be paid by the county of the court exercising jurisdiction over such proceeding, provided that the judge who actually presided over the hearing includes a finding in the order that the party against whom such costs, compensation, fees, and expenses are cast pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (4) of this subsection appears to lack sufficient assets to defray such costs, compensation, fees, and expenses;

The conduct of any party or other person subject to the jurisdiction of the court who has been the perpetrator of abuse, neglect, or exploitation against the person or property of the minor, proposed ward, or ward, provided that the judge who actually presided over the hearing includes a finding in the order determining that such abuse, neglect, or exploitation against the person or property of the minor, proposed ward, or ward has occurred and identifying the perpetrator thereof; or

Any property, fund, or proceeds recovered on behalf of or in favor of the minor or ward.

In all proceedings pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, or 11 of this title other than for the appointment of a guardian or conservator, the costs, compensation, fees, and expenses provided for by subsection (a) of this Code section may be assessed and shall be paid as directed by the court in the exercise of its sound discretion and as the court may deem to be in the best interest of the minor, proposed ward, or ward who is the subject of the particular proceeding, considering the following:

The estate of the minor or ward for whom a guardian or conservator has been appointed in any such proceeding, if the court finds that the proceeding was brought in the best interest of the minor or ward;

The conduct of the petitioners or movants in any such proceeding;

The conduct of a guardian or conservator or the surety on such guardian’s or conservator’s bond, subject to other applicable law governing the liability of sureties on such bonds, in any such proceeding, if:

Such guardian or conservator admits to a violation of any obligation of such guardian or conservator in such guardian’s or conservator’s representative capacity under this title or other applicable law;

The court finds that such guardian or conservator has committed a breach of fiduciary duty or has threatened to commit a breach of fiduciary duty;

The court revokes or suspends such guardian’s letters of guardianship or such conservator’s letters of conservatorship or imposes sanctions upon such guardian or conservator in such proceeding; or

The court otherwise finds that such guardian or conservator has committed misconduct or has acted contrary to the best interest of the minor or ward;

Whether such costs, compensation, fees, and expenses shall be paid by the county of the court exercising jurisdiction over any such proceeding, provided that the judge who actually presided over the hearing includes a finding in the order that the party against whom such costs, compensation, fees, and expenses are cast pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (5) of this subsection appears to lack sufficient assets to defray such costs, compensation, fees, and expenses;

The conduct of any party or other person subject to the jurisdiction of the court who has been the perpetrator of abuse, neglect, or exploitation against the person or property of the minor, proposed ward, or ward, provided that the judge who actually presided over the hearing includes a finding in the order determining that such abuse, neglect, or exploitation against the person or property of the minor, proposed ward, or ward has occurred and identifying the perpetrator thereof; or

Any property, fund, or proceeds recovered on behalf of or in favor of the minor or ward.

An award of costs, compensation, fees, and expenses under this Code section may be enforced by a judgment, writ of fieri facias, execution, or attachment for contempt.

For purposes of paragraph (4) of subsection (b) and paragraph (5) of subsection (c) of this Code section, “abuse, neglect, or exploitation” shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following when committed by an identified perpetrator against the person or property of the minor, proposed ward, or ward:

Conduct for which an additional civil penalty has been imposed under Code Section 10-1-851 after consideration of the factors enumerated in Code Section 10-1-852;

Conduct giving rise to a cause of action under Code Section 10-1-853;

Abuse, child abuse, coercion, deception, emotional abuse, exploitation, isolation, sexual abuse, or sexual exploitation as such terms are defined in Code Sections 15-11-2, 16-5-100, 16-5-102.1, 30-5-3, and 49-5-40;

Trafficking of persons for labor or sexual servitude as prohibited by Code Section 16-5-46;

Conduct in violation of Code Section 16-5-70, 16-5-72, 16-5-102, 16-12-1, 16-12-100.1, 16-12-100.2, or 30-5-8;

Conduct constituting neglect within the meaning of Code Section 16-5-101 or 30-5-3;

A serious violent felony as such term is defined in Code Section 17-10-6.1;

A sexual offense as such term is defined in Code Section 17-10-6.2; and

Conduct giving rise to a report, investigation, or hearing in accordance with Code Section 30-5-4, 30-5-5, or 31-7-9. For purposes of this paragraph, a probate court acting under this Code section is a court of competent jurisdiction as provided for in subsection (a) of Code Section 30-5-7.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 26/HB 70; Ga. L. 2022, p. 198, § 2/HB 464.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “A person who is appointed as counsel for a ward, proposed ward, or alleged incapacitated person is not eligible to be appointed as guardian ad litem for the same individual, and a person who is appointed as guardian ad litem for a ward, proposed ward, or alleged incapacitated person is not eligible to be appointed as counsel for the same individual.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, rewrote subsection (b); in subsection (c), substituted “considering the following” for “as follows” at the end of the introductory paragraph, substituted “The estate” for “From the estate” at the beginning of paragraph (c)(1), substituted “The conduct of the petitioners” for “By the petitioners” at the beginning of paragraph (c)(2), substituted “The conduct of a guardian or conservator or the surety” for “From a guardian or conservator or from the surety” at the beginning of paragraph (c)(3), substituted “Whether such costs, compensation, fees, and expenses shall be paid by the county” for “By the county” at the beginning of paragraph (c)(4), substituted “The conduct of any party” for “By any party” at the beginning of paragraph (c)(5), rewrote paragraph (c)(6); and added subsection (e).

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 327 (2019).

29-9-4.
Personal service; procedure.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a party in interest who is a resident of this state is entitled to personal service of any petition and citation for proceedings that are subject to the provisions of this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, personal service shall be made by delivery of a copy of the petition and citation by the sheriff or some other lawful officer at least ten days before the hearing except that, if waived in writing, the ten-day provision shall not apply. An entry of service shall be made on the original and the copy for the party served.

A party who is in the military service may be served by any commissioned officer who shall file with the court a certificate stating that copies of the petition and citation were served in person.

Individuals who are not sui juris shall be served as provided in this chapter or as provided in Code Section 15-9-17.

When personal service is required by this Code section, unless otherwise directed by the court, service may be made by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery if the petitioner so requests in the petition. The court shall cause a copy of the petition and the citation to be sent by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery with return receipt requested and with delivery restricted to addressee only. If the return receipt is not signed by the addressee, dated at least ten days before the date specified in the citation, and received by the court before the date specified in the citation for the filing of objections, service shall be made as otherwise required by this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-9-5.
Service upon current residence addresses; service by publication.

Except as otherwise provided by law or directed by the probate judge pursuant to Code Section 29-9-6, the provisions of this Code section shall apply in cases when a person to be served has a known current residence address outside this state or whose current address is unknown.

Unless all persons have known current residence addresses, the court shall order service to be perfected by publication of the citation in the newspaper in which the sheriff’s advertisements are published in the county in which the petition is filed. The citation shall be published once a week for four weeks prior to the date on which objections must be filed. The records of the court shall show the persons notified and the character of the notice given. The published citation shall be directed to the person to be served.

If the current residence address of a person is known, service shall be made by mailing by first-class mail a copy of the petition and the citation.

When service by publication is ordered pursuant to this Code section, compliance with the provisions of this Code section relating to a person to be notified who is known but whose current residence address is unknown shall be equivalent to personal service of a copy of the petition and citation when the fact appears in the records of the court showing the persons notified and the character of the notice given. In the case of a known person whose current residence address is unknown, that person’s name shall appear in the records of the court, and the records shall show service by publication as to that person in compliance with this Code section. In any case in which service by publication is granted, one order for publication shall be sufficient and the published citation shall be directed as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-9-6.
Service upon conservator or guardian.

If one or more unsuccessful attempts at personal service are made by the sheriff or deputy upon a conservator or guardian appointed in this state at the last known address of the conservator or guardian that appears in the court records and it appears to the court that further attempts are likely to be futile, then service shall be sufficient upon the conservator or guardian if the citation is mailed by first-class mail to the last known address of the conservator or guardian.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-9-7.
Judge’s discretion on notice, service, and additional time for proceedings; additional notice requirements for persons residing in another state.

The probate judge may direct any additional service or notice or extend the time to respond to any proceedings covered by this title as the judge may determine to be proper in the interest of due process and reasonable opportunity for any party or interest to be heard.

If a petition for appointment of a guardian or conservator is filed and the petition lists any state in which the proposed ward was physically present, including any period of temporary absence, for at least six consecutive months immediately before the filing of the petition or ending within the six months prior to the filing of the petition pursuant to paragraph (17) of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-10 or paragraph (19) of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-5-10, in addition to any other notice requirements, notice shall be given by the court to those persons who reside in such other state who are named in the petition pursuant to paragraphs (7) through (9) of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-10 or paragraphs (8) through (10) of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-5-10 in such additional manner as the court determines might be reasonably calculated to give actual notice to such persons. Such additional manner may include the publication of notice in the county of such other state in which the proposed ward was physically present, including any period of temporary absence, for at least six consecutive months immediately before the filing of the petition.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 884, § 3/HB 446.

29-9-8.
Waiver of service or notice; written consent.

Service or notice may be waived or acknowledged before or after the filing of the petition. The waiver or acknowledgment of service shall be in writing, signed by the person to be served or some person competent to do so, shall be sworn before the court or a notary public, and shall be filed with the court.

The written consent of a party to the granting of any relief or the entry of any order sought in a proceeding, whether executed before or after the filing of the petition, shall constitute a waiver and acknowledgment of notice and service of the proceedings, waiver of citation, entry of appearance, answer admitting all allegations of facts set forth in the petition as true and correct, and consent to the granting of the relief or the order sought.

A person in military service, regardless of age, shall be permitted to make any waiver, acknowledgment, or consent described in this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-9-9.
Oaths, affirmations, and affidavits.

An oath or affirmation or affidavit required or allowed to be made before or attested by a notary public may be made before any notary public or other officer authorized to administer oaths by the state in which the oath or affirmation or affidavit is made. The oath or affirmation or affidavit, if made outside this state, shall have the same force and effect as if it had been made before an officer of this state authorized to administer oaths. The official attestation of the officer before whom the oath or affirmation or affidavit is made shall be prima-facie evidence of the official character of the officer and that the officer was authorized by law to administer oaths.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-9-10.
Oath by department delegate.

When appointed pursuant to subsection (b.1) of Code Section 29-4-3, a duly appointed delegate of the Department of Human Services is authorized to take the oath of guardianship before the judge of any probate court of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 509, § 4/HB 394; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 509, § 9/HB 394, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2005, and all appointments of guardians of the person made pursuant to former Title 29 shall continue in effect and shall thereafter be governed by the provisions of this Act.”

29-9-11.
Verification of petitions and returns; consolidation and transfer of proceedings.

Every petition and return filed in the court shall be verified by an oath sworn to or affirmed before the court or a notary public.

Where appropriate, petitions for separate appointments, such as the appointment of a guardian and a conservator or the appointment of a guardian and an emergency guardian, may be consolidated into one petition and the filing and giving of notice of the petitions may occur simultaneously.

If the petition for the appointment of a guardian or a conservator of a minor is originally filed in the court of the county in which the minor is found, on motion of either party, if found by such court to be appropriate, the case may be transferred to the court of the county of the minor’s domicile.

If the petition for the appointment of a guardian or a conservator of a proposed ward is originally filed in the court of the county in which the proposed ward is found or in which jurisdiction is otherwise proper under Code Section 29-11-12, on motion of either party, if found by such court to be appropriate and unless otherwise provided by Chapter 11 of this title, the case may be transferred to the court of the county of the proposed ward’s domicile.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 27/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted the present provisions of subsection (c) for the former provisions, which read: “If the petition for the appointment of a guardian or a conservator of a minor or a proposed ward is originally filed in the county in which the minor or proposed ward is found, on motion of either party, if appropriate, the case may be transferred to the county of the minor’s or proposed ward’s domicile.”; and added subsection (d).

29-9-12.
Issuance of citations.

For purposes of this Code section, the terms “citation” and “notice” shall have the same meaning unless the context otherwise requires.

Upon the filing of a petition, a citation shall be issued addressed to the persons required to be served or entitled to notice; provided, however, if all parties have acknowledged service and assented to the petition, no citation need issue. The citation shall state that any objection must be made in writing and shall designate the date on or before which objections must be filed in the court. The citation shall also state whether the hearing shall take place on a certain date or be specially scheduled for a later date. With respect to all proceedings under this title, the citation, if any, may state that if no objections are filed, the petition may be granted without a hearing.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-9-13.
Satisfaction of requirements of authentication or exemplification.

Except as otherwise provided by law or directed by the judge with respect to any particular proceeding, the date on or before which any objection is required to be filed shall be not less than ten days after the date the person is personally served. For persons within the United States who are served by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, the date on or before any objection is required to be filed shall not be less than 14 days from the date of mailing or delivering; provided, however, that if a return receipt from any recipient is received by the court within 14 days from the date of mailing or delivering, the date on or before which any objection is required to be filed by such recipient shall be ten days from the date of receipt as shown on the return receipt. For a person outside the United States who is served by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, the date on or before any objection is required to be filed shall not be less than 30 days from the date the citation is mailed or delivered; provided, however, that if the return receipt from any recipient is received by the court during such 30 day period the date on or before which any objection is required to be filed by such recipient shall not be earlier than ten days from the date of receipt shown on such return receipt. For a person served by publication, the date on or before which any objection is required to be filed shall be no sooner than the first day of the week following publication once each week for four weeks.

Except as otherwise provided by law or directed by the judge with respect to any particular proceeding, the date on which any required hearing shall be held shall be the date by which any objection is required to be filed or such later date as the court may specify. When the matter is set for hearing on a date that was not specified in the citation, the court shall send by first-class mail a notice of the time of the hearing to the petitioner and all parties who have served responses at the addresses given by each of them in their pleadings.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Code section, the date by which objections must be filed or on which the hearing shall be held shall be no earlier than ten days after the date of service on any person who is entitled to personal service.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95; Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 20/SB 534.

29-9-13.1.
Authentication of documents.

Whenever it is required that a document that is to be filed in the court be authenticated or exemplified, such requirement shall be met by complying with the provisions of Code Section 24-9-922 and paragraphs (1) through (4) of Code Section 24-9-902, and such full faith and credit shall be given to the document as is provided in such Code sections.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-13.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 41/HB 24; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 29/HB 942; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 28/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted the second occurrence of “that” for “which” near the beginning, and inserted a comma following “24-9-902”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, the second Code Section 29-9-13, as enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 161, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 29-9-13.1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2010).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

29-9-14.
Court ordered hearings.

The court on its own motion may order a hearing on any matter related to a conservatorship or guardianship even if no objection is filed.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-9-15.
Compensation for legal counsel or guardian ad litem.

In connection with any proceeding brought pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, or 11 of this title, unless voluntarily waived, the court shall award reasonable fees and expenses, commensurate with the tasks performed and time devoted to the proceeding, including any appeals, to any legal counsel or guardian ad litem who is appointed by the court pursuant to the provisions of said chapters or Code Section 29-9-2.

In connection with any proceeding brought pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, or 11 of this title, unless voluntarily waived, the court may award reasonable fees and expenses, commensurate with the tasks performed and time devoted to the proceeding, including any appeals, to any legal counsel who is retained by or on behalf of a minor, a proposed ward, a ward, the petitioner or petitioners, or any other party to any proceeding brought pursuant to the provisions of said chapters. As directed by the court in the exercise of its sound discretion and as the court may deem to be in the best interest of the minor, proposed ward, or ward who is the subject of the particular proceeding.

All fees and expenses awarded under subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section shall be assessed and paid in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 29-9-3.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 29/HB 70; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 29/SB 429.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “Any legal counsel or guardian ad litem who is appointed by the court in a guardianship or conservatorship proceeding shall be awarded reasonable fees commensurate with the tasks performed and time devoted to the proceeding, including any appeals.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “the petitioner or petitioners” for “the petitioner(s)” near the end of the first sentence of subsection (b).

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 327 (2019).

29-9-16.
Compensation to physicians, psychologists, or licensed clinical social workers.

For the evaluation or examination required by subsection (d) of Code Section 29-4-11, subsection (c) of Code Section 29-4-15, subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-42, subsection (d) of Code Section 29-5-11, subsection (c) of Code Section 29-5-15, or subsection (b) of Code Section 29-5-71, the evaluating physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker shall receive a reasonable fee commensurate with the task performed, plus actual expenses.

In the event the attendance of the evaluating physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker shall be required by the court for a hearing under subsection (d) of Code Section 29-4-12, subsection (a) of Code Section 29-4-16, subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-42, subsection (d) of Code Section 29-5-12, subsection (a) of Code Section 29-5-16, or subsection (b) of Code Section 29-5-71, other than pursuant to a subpoena requested by a party to the proceeding, the evaluating physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker shall receive a reasonable fee commensurate with the task performed, plus actual expenses.

All fees and expenses payable under subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section shall be assessed by the court and paid in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 29-9-3.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 30/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “For the evaluation or examination required by subsection (d) of Code Section 29-4-11 or subsection (d) of Code Section 29-5-11, the evaluating physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker shall receive a reasonable fee commensurate with the task performed, plus actual expenses. For the hearing under subsection (d) of Code Section 29-4-12 or subsection (d) of Code Section 29-5-12, the evaluating physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker shall receive an amount not to exceed $75.00 plus actual expenses.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 327 (2019).

29-9-17.
Court ordered instruction for conservator or guardian.

At the time of appointment and at any time throughout the conservatorship or guardianship, the court may order the conservator or guardian to undergo such instruction as the court deems appropriate.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-9-18.
Sealing of records on conservatorship or guardianship.

All of the records relating to any minor or adult guardianship or conservatorship granted under this title and all of the records relating to any adult guardianship or conservatorship transferred or accepted under Article 3 of Chapter 11 of this title shall be kept sealed, except for a record of the names and addresses of the minor, ward, and guardian or conservator and their legal counsel of record and the dates of filing, granting, terminating, transferring, and accepting the guardianship or conservatorship. The sealed records may be examined by the ward and the ward’s legal counsel; the minor, the minor’s parents, and the minor’s legal counsel; the guardian or conservator and the guardian’s or conservator’s legal counsel; and any surety for the guardian or conservator and legal counsel for the surety at any time.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 29-11-5 and in subsection (c) of this Code section, a request by other interested parties to examine the sealed records shall be by petition to the court, and the ward and guardian or conservator shall have at least 30 days’ prior written notice of a hearing on the petition; provided, however, that for good cause shown to the court, the court may shorten such notice period or grant the petition without notice. The matter shall come before the court in chambers. The order allowing access shall be granted upon a finding that the public interest in granting access to the sealed records clearly outweighs the harm otherwise resulting to the privacy of the person in interest, and the court shall limit the portion of the file to which access is granted to that which is required to meet the legitimate needs of the petitioner. The court, in its discretion, may assess and award costs, compensation, fees, and expenses for a proceeding under this subsection in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 29-9-3.

To the extent reasonably required to facilitate any communication or fulfill any request to take any action pursuant to Chapter 11 of this title, a court of this state may disclose the records referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section to a court of another state.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-9-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 715, § 7/SB 508; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 31/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, in subsection (a), in the first sentence, deleted “that is” following “conservatorship”, inserted “and all of the records relating to any adult guardianship or conservatorship transferred or accepted under Article 3 of Chapter 11 of this title”, and substituted “dates of filing, granting, terminating, transferring, and accepting” for “date of filing, granting, and terminating”, and in the second sentence, revised punctuation, substituted “guardian’s” for “guardian” in the middle, inserted “guardian or” near the end; and in subsection (b), in the first sentence, substituted “Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 29-11-5 and in subsection (c) of this Code section, a” for “A” at the beginning and added a comma following “court” in the middle and added the fourth sentence; and added subsection (c).

Law reviews.

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

For annual survey on trial practice and procedure, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 363 (2009).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 385 (2009).